Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-8,313
Semiquincentennial; point of contact; official observance; cooperation required.

(1) The Semiquincentennial Commission is the point of contact for state and national organizations and events related to the Semiquincentennial of the United States and may also seek the guidance and support of any party.

(2) The Semiquincentennial Commission shall develop programs and plans for the official observance of the two hundred fiftieth anniversary of the founding of the United States, as marked by the Declaration of Independence in 1776.

(3) The commission shall cooperate with the United States Semiquincentennial Commission and various state agencies, boards, commissions, departments, and political subdivisions in order to execute commemorative events and to implement educational activities, events, and celebrations related to the Semiquincentennial of the United States.

(4) The commission shall promote under-represented groups from the American Revolutionary War, including, but not limited to, women, American Indians, and persons of color.

Laws 2021, LB275, § 3.